New Jersey, session 221, S1246.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Primarily consists of contact with children" means 80 percent or more of the actual or official duties or responsibilities include contact with a child. "Sex offender" means a person who has been convicted, adjudicated delinquent or found not guilty by reason of insanity for commission of a sex offense as defined in subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) and whose risk of re-offense has been assessed as moderate or high pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1994, c.128 (C.2C:7-8). 2.    a.   It shall be a crime of the third degree for a sex offender to accept any appointment, enter into any contract for, participate in, or serve in any job, position, situation, or employment of any type that primarily consists of contact with children. b.  The provisions of this act shall not apply to participation by a sex offender under 18 years of age in any job, position, situation, or employment which provides rehabilitative or other services to juvenile sex offenders. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.